North Carolina statutes. Chapter 130A. Public Health.
Article 9. Solid Waste Management.
§ 130A-309.219.
Permit requirements for projects using coal combustion products for structural fill.

Permit Requirements. —

Projects using coal combustion products as structural fill involving the placement of less than 8,000 tons of coal combustion products per acre or less than 80,000 tons of coal combustion products in total per project, which proceed in compliance with
the requirements of this section and rules adopted thereunder, are deemed permitted. Any person proposing such a project shall submit an application for a permit to the Department upon such form as the Department may prescribe,
including, at a minimum, the information set forth in subdivision (1) of subsection (b) of this section.

No person shall commence or operate a project using coal combustion residuals as structural fill involving the placement of 8,000 or more tons of coal combustion products per acre or 80,000 or more tons of coal combustion products in total per project
without first receiving an individual permit from the Department. Any person proposing such a project shall submit an application for a permit to the Department upon such form as the Department may prescribe, including,
at a minimum, the information set forth in subdivisions (1) and (2) of subsection (b) of this section.

Information to Be Provided to the Department. — At least 60 days before initiation of a proposed project using coal combustion products as structural fill, the person proposing the project shall submit all of the following information to the Department
on a form as prescribed by the Department:

For projects involving placement of less than 8,000 tons of coal combustion products per acre or less than 80,000 tons of coal combustion products in total per project, the person shall provide, at a minimum, the following information:

The description of the nature, purpose, and location of the project.

The estimated start and completion dates for the project.

An estimate of the volume of coal combustion products to be used in the project.

A Toxicity Characteristic Leaching Procedure analysis from a representative sample of each different coal combustion product’s source to be used in the project for, at a minimum, all of the following constituents: arsenic, barium, cadmium, lead, chromium,
mercury, selenium, and silver.

A signed and dated statement by the owner of the land on which the structural fill is to be placed, acknowledging and consenting to the use of coal combustion products as structural fill on the property and agreeing to record the fill in accordance with
the requirements of G.S. 130A-390.219 [130A-309.223].

The name, address, and contact information for the generator of the coal combustion products.

Physical location of the project at which the coal combustion products were generated.

For projects involving placement of 8,000 or more tons of coal combustion products per acre or 80,000 or more tons of coal combustion products in total per project, the person shall provide all information required pursuant to subdivision (1) of this
subsection and shall provide construction plans for the project, including a stability analysis as the Department may require. If required by the Department, a stability analysis shall be prepared, signed, and sealed by
a professional engineer in accordance with sound engineering practices. A construction plan shall, at a minimum, include a groundwater monitoring system and an encapsulation liner system in compliance with the requirements
of

G.S. 130A-309.220

.

History.
2014-122, s. 3(a).

§ 130A-309.220.
Design, construction, and siting requirements for projects using coal combustion products for structural fill.

Design, Construction, and Operation of Structural Fill Sites. —

A structural fill site must be designed, constructed, operated, closed, and maintained in such a manner as to minimize the potential for harmful release of constituents of coal combustion residuals to the environment or create a nuisance to the public.

Coal combustion products shall be collected and transported in a manner that will prevent nuisances and hazards to public health and safety. Coal combustion products shall be moisture conditioned, as necessary, and transported in covered trucks to prevent
dusting.

Coal combustion products shall be placed uniformly and shall be compacted to standards, including in situ density, compaction effort, and relative density, specified by a registered professional engineer for a specific end-use purpose.

Equipment shall be provided that is capable of placing and compacting the coal combustion products and handling the earthwork required during the periods that coal combustion products are received at the fill project.

The coal combustion product structural fill project shall be effectively maintained and operated as a nondischarge system to prevent discharge to surface water resulting from the project.

The coal combustion product structural fill project shall be effectively maintained and operated to ensure no violations of groundwater standards adopted by the Environmental Management Commission pursuant to Article 21 of Chapter 143 of the General Statutes
due to the project.

Surface waters resulting from precipitation shall be diverted away from the active coal combustion product placement area during filling and construction activity.

Site development shall comply with the North Carolina Sedimentation Pollution Control Act of 1973, as amended.

The structural fill project shall be operated with sufficient dust control measures to minimize airborne emissions and to prevent dust from creating a nuisance or safety hazard and shall not violate applicable air quality regulations.

Coal combustion products utilized on an exterior slope of a structural fill shall not be placed with a slope greater than 3.0 horizontal to 1.0 vertical.

Compliance with this subsection shall not insulate any of the owners or operators of a structural fill project from claims for damages to surface waters, groundwater, or air resulting from the operation of the structural fill project. If the project fails
to comply with the requirements of this section, the constructor, generator, owner, or operator shall notify the Department and shall take any immediate corrective action as may be required by the Department.

Liners, Leachate Collection System, Cap, and Groundwater Monitoring System Required for Large Structural Fills. — For projects involving placement of 8,000 or more tons of coal combustion products per acre or 80,000 or more tons of coal combustion products
in total per project shall have an encapsulation liner system. The encapsulation liner system shall be constructed on and around the structural fill and shall be designed to efficiently contain, collect, and remove leachate generated
by the coal combustion products, as well as separate the coal combustion products from any exposure to surrounding environs. At a minimum, the components of the liner system shall consist of the following:

A base liner, which shall consist of one of the following designs:

A composite liner utilizing a compacted clay liner. This composite liner is one liner that consists of two components: a geomembrane liner installed above and in direct and uniform contact with a compacted clay liner with a minimum thickness of 24 inches
(0.61 m) and a permeability of no more than 1.0 x 10-7 centimeters per second.

A composite liner utilizing a geosynthetic clay liner. This composite liner is one liner that consists of three components: a geomembrane liner installed above and in uniform contact with a geosynthetic clay liner overlying a compacted clay liner with
a minimum thickness of 18 inches (0.46 m) and a permeability of no more than 1.0 x 10-5 centimeters per second.

A leachate collection system, which is constructed directly above the base liner and shall be designed to effectively collect and remove leachate from the project.

A cap system that is designed to minimize infiltration and erosion as follows:

The cap system shall be designed and constructed to (i) have a permeability less than or equal to the permeability of any base liner system or the in situ subsoils underlying the structural fill, or the permeability specified for the final cover in the
effective permit, or a permeability no greater than 1 x 10-5 centimeters per second, whichever is less; (ii) minimize infiltration through the closed structural fill by the use of a low-permeability barrier that
contains a minimum 18 inches of earthen material; and (iii) minimize erosion of the cap system and protect the low-permeability barrier from root penetration by use of an erosion layer that contains a minimum of
six inches of earthen material that is capable of sustaining native plant growth.

The Department may approve an alternative cap system if the owner or operator can adequately demonstrate (i) the alternative cap system will achieve an equivalent or greater reduction in infiltration as the low-permeability barrier specified in sub-subdivision
a. of this subdivision and (ii) the erosion layer will provide equivalent or improved protection as the erosion layer specified in sub-subdivision a. of this subdivision.

A groundwater monitoring system, that shall be approved by the Department and, at a minimum, consists of all of the following:

A sufficient number of wells, installed at appropriate locations and depths, to yield groundwater samples from the uppermost aquifer that represent the quality of groundwater passing the relevant point of compliance as approved by the Department. A down-gradient
monitoring system shall be installed at the relevant point of compliance so as to ensure detection of groundwater contamination in the uppermost aquifer.

A proposed monitoring plan, which shall be certified by a licensed geologist or professional engineer to be effective in providing early detection of any release of hazardous constituents from any point in a structural fill or leachate surface impoundment
to the uppermost aquifer, so as to be protective of public health, safety, and welfare; the environment; and natural resources.

A groundwater monitoring program, which shall include consistent sampling and analysis procedures that are designed to ensure monitoring results that provide an accurate representation of groundwater quality at the background and down-gradient wells.
Monitoring shall be conducted through construction and the post-closure care period. The sampling procedures and frequency shall be protective of public health, safety, and welfare; the environment; and natural
resources.

A detection monitoring program for all Appendix I constituents. For purposes of this subdivision, the term “Appendix I” means Appendix I to 40 C.F.R. Part 258, “Appendix I Constituents for Detection Monitoring,” including subsequent amendments and editions.

An assessment monitoring program and corrective action plan if one or more of the constituents listed in Appendix I is detected in exceedance of a groundwater protection standard.

Siting for Structural Fill Facilities. — Coal combustion products used as a structural fill shall not be placed:

Within 50 feet of any property boundary.

Within 300 horizontal feet of a private dwelling or well.

Within 50 horizontal feet of the top of the bank of a perennial stream or other surface water body.

Within four feet of the seasonal high groundwater table.

Within a 100-year floodplain except as authorized under

G.S. 143-215.54

A(b). A site located in a floodplain shall not restrict the flow of the 100-year flood, reduce the temporary water storage capacity of the floodplain or result in washout of solid waste so as to pose a
hazard to human life, wildlife or land or water resources.

Within 50 horizontal feet of a wetland, unless, after consideration of the chemical and physical impact on the wetland, the United States Army Corps of Engineers issues a permit or waiver for the fill.

History.
2014-122, s. 3(a); 2015-1, s. 3.1(c).

§ 130A-309.221.
Financial assurance requirements for large projects using coal combustion products for structural fill.

For projects involving placement of 8,000 or more tons of coal combustion products per acre or 80,000 or more tons of coal combustion products in total per project, the applicant for a permit or a permit holder to construct or operate a structural fill
shall establish financial assurance that will ensure that sufficient funds are available for facility closure, post-closure maintenance and monitoring, any corrective action that the Department may require, and to satisfy any potential
liability for sudden and nonsudden accidental occurrences, and subsequent costs incurred by the Department in response to an incident at a structural fill project, even if the applicant or permit holder becomes insolvent or ceases
to reside, be incorporated, do business, or maintain assets in the State.

To establish sufficient availability of funds under this section, the applicant for a permit or a permit holder may use insurance, financial tests, third-party guarantees by persons who can pass the financial test, guarantees by corporate parents who
can pass the financial test, irrevocable letters of credit, trusts, surety bonds, or any other financial device, or any combination of the foregoing shown to provide protection equivalent to the financial protection that would
be provided by insurance if insurance were the only mechanism used.

The applicant for a permit or a permit holder and any parent, subsidiary, or other affiliate of the applicant, permit holder, or parent, including any joint venturer with a direct or indirect interest in the applicant, permit holder, or parent shall be
a guarantor of payment for closure, post-closure maintenance and monitoring, any corrective action that the Department may require, and to satisfy any potential liability for sudden and nonsudden accidental occurrences arising
from the operation of the hazardous waste facility.

Assets used to meet the financial assurance requirements of this section shall be in a form that will allow the Department to readily access funds for the purposes set out in this section. Assets used to meet financial assurance requirements of this section
shall not be accessible to the permit holder except as approved by the Department.

The Department may provide a copy of any filing that an applicant for a permit or a permit holder submits to the Department to meet the financial responsibility requirements under this section to the State Treasurer. The State Treasurer shall review the
filing and provide the Department with a written opinion as to the adequacy of the filing to meet the purposes of this section, including any recommended changes.

In order to continue to hold a permit for a structural fill, a permit holder must maintain financial responsibility as required by this Part and must provide any information requested by the Department to establish that the permit holder continues to
maintain financial responsibility.

An applicant for a permit or a permit holder shall satisfy the Department that the applicant or permit holder has met the financial responsibility requirements of this Part before the Department is required to otherwise review the application.

History.
2014-122, s. 3(a).

§ 130A-309.222.
Closure of projects using coal combustion products for structural fill.

Closure of Structural Fill Projects. —

No later than 30 working days or 60 calendar days, whichever is less, after coal combustion product placement has ceased, the final cover shall be applied over the coal combustion product placement area.

The final surface of the structural fill shall be graded and provided with drainage systems that do all of the following:

Minimize erosion of cover materials.

Promote drainage of area precipitation, minimize infiltration, and prevent ponding of surface water on the structural fill.

Other erosion control measures, such as temporary mulching, seeding, or silt barriers shall be installed to ensure no visible coal combustion product migration to adjacent properties until the beneficial end use of the project is realized.

The constructor or operator shall submit a certification to the Department signed and sealed by a registered professional engineer or signed by the Secretary of the Department of Transportation or the Secretary’s designee certifying that all requirements
of this Subpart have been met. The report shall be submitted within 30 days of application of the final cover.

Additional Closure and Post-Closure Requirements for Large Structural Fill Projects. — For projects involving placement of 8,000 or more tons of coal combustion products per acre or 80,000 or more tons of coal combustion products in total per project,
a constructor or operator shall conduct post-closure care. Post-closure care shall be conducted for 30 years, which period may be increased by the Department upon a determination that a longer period is necessary to protect public
health, safety, and welfare; the environment; and natural resources, or decreased upon a determination that a shorter period is sufficient to protect public health, safety, and welfare; the environment; and natural resources. Additional
closure and post-closure requirements include, at a minimum, all of the following:

Submit a written closure plan that includes all of the following:

A description of the cap liner system and the methods and procedures used to install the cap that conforms to the requirement in

G.S. 130A-309.220

(b).

An estimate of the largest area of the structural fill project ever requiring the cap liner system at any time during the overall construction period that is consistent with the drawings prepared for the structural fill.

An estimate of the maximum inventory of coal combustion products ever on-site over the construction duration of the structural fill.

A schedule for completing all activities necessary to satisfy the closure criteria set forth in this section.

Submit a written post-closure plan that includes all of the following:

A description of the monitoring and maintenance activities required for the project and the frequency at which these activities must be performed.

The name, address, and telephone number of the person or office responsible for the project during the post-closure period.

A description of the planned uses of the property during the post-closure period. Post-closure use of the property must not disturb the integrity of the cap system, base liner system, or any other components of the containment system or the function of
the monitoring systems, unless necessary to comply with the requirements of this subsection. The Department may approve disturbance if the constructor or operator demonstrates that disturbance of the cap system,
base liner system, or other component of the containment system will not increase the potential threat to public health, safety, and welfare; the environment; and natural resources.

The cost estimate for post-closure activities required under this section.

Maintain the integrity and effectiveness of any cap system, including repairing the system as necessary to correct the defects of settlement, subsidence, erosion, or other events and preventing run-on and runoff from eroding or otherwise damaging the
cap system.

Maintain and operate the leachate collection system. The Department may allow the constructor or operator to stop managing leachate upon a satisfactory demonstration that leachate from the project no longer poses a threat to human health and the environment.

Monitor and maintain the groundwater monitoring system in accordance with

G.S. 130A-309.220

and monitor the surface water in accordance with 15A NCAC 13B .0602.

Completion of Post-Closure Care. — Following completion of the post-closure care period, the constructor or operator shall submit a certification, signed by a registered professional engineer, to the Department, verifying that post-closure care has been
completed in accordance with the post-closure plan, and include the certification in the operating record.

History.
2014-122, s. 3(a).

§ 130A-309.223.
Recordation of projects using coal combustion products for structural fill.

The owner of land where coal combustion products have been used in volumes of more than 1,000 cubic yards shall file a statement of the volume and locations of the coal combustion residuals with the Register of Deeds in the county or counties where the
property is located. The statement shall identify the parcel of land according to the complete legal description on the recorded deed, either by metes and bounds or by reference to a recorded plat map. The statement shall be signed
and acknowledged by the landowners in the form prescribed by

G.S. 47-38

through

G.S. 47-43

.

Recordation shall be required within 90 days after completion of a structural fill project using coal combustion residuals.

The Register of Deeds, in accordance with

G.S. 161-14

, shall record the notarized statement and index it in the Grantor Index under the name of the owner of the land. The original notarized statement with the Register’s seal and the date, book, and page number of recording
shall be returned to the Department after recording.

When property with more than 1,000 cubic yards of coal combustion products is sold, leased, conveyed, or transferred in any manner, the deed or other instrument of transfer shall contain in the description section in no smaller type than used in the body
of the deed or instrument a statement that coal combustion products have been used as structural fill material on the property.

History.
2014-122, s. 3(a).

§ 130A-309.224.
Department of Transportation projects.

The Department and the Department of Transportation may agree on specific design, construction, siting, operation, and closure criteria that may apply to the Department of Transportation structural fill projects.

History.
2014-122, s. 3(a).

§ 130A-309.225.
Inventory and inspection of certain structural fill projects.

No later than July 1, 2015, the Department shall prepare an inventory of all structural fill projects with a volume of 10,000 cubic yards or more. The Department shall update the structural fill project inventory at least annually. The Department shall
inspect each structural fill project with a volume of 10,000 cubic yards or more at least annually to determine if the project or facility has been constructed and operated in compliance with Section .1700 of Subchapter B of Chapter
13 of Title 15A of the North Carolina Administrative Code (Requirements for Beneficial Use of Coal Combustion By-Products) and Section .1200 of Subchapter T of Chapter 2 of Title 15A of the North Carolina Administrative Code (Coal
Combustion Products Management), as applicable.

History.
2014-122, s. 3(a).

§ 130A-309.226.
Amendments required to rules.

Requirements under existing rules governing the use of coal combustion products for structural fill that do not conflict with the provisions of this Subpart shall continue to apply to such projects. The Environmental Management Commission shall amend
existing rules governing the use of coal combustion products for structural fill as necessary to implement the provisions of this Subpart. Such rules shall be exempt from the requirements of

G.S. 150B-19.3

.

History.
2014-122, s. 3(a).

§§ 130A-309.227 through 130A-309.229.

Reserved for future codification purposes.

Subpart 4. Enforcement.

§ 130A-309.230.
General enforcement.

Except as otherwise provided in this Subpart, the provisions of this Part shall be enforced as provided in Article 1 of this Chapter.

History.
2014-122, s. 3(a).

§ 130A-309.231.
Penalties for making false statements.

Any person who knowingly makes any false statement, representation, or certification in any application, record, report, plan, or other document filed or required to be maintained under this Part or a rule implementing this Part shall be guilty of a Class
2 misdemeanor, which may include a fine not to exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000).

History.
2014-122, s. 3(a).

Part 3. Inactive Hazardous Sites.

§ 130A-310.
Definitions.

Unless a different meaning is required by the context, the following definitions shall apply throughout this Part:

“CERCLA/SARA” means the Comprehensive Environmental Response, Compensation, and Liability Act of 1980, Pub. L. 96-510, 94 Stat. 2767, 42 U.S.C. 9601 et seq., as amended, and the Superfund Amendments and Reauthorization Act of 1986, Pub. L. 99-499, 100
Stat. 1613, as amended.

“Hazardous substance” means hazardous substance as defined in CERCLA/SARA.

“Inactive hazardous substance or waste disposal site” or “site” means any facility, as defined in CERCLA/SARA. These sites do not include hazardous waste facilities permitted or in interim status under this Article.

“Operator” means the person responsible for the overall operation of an inactive hazardous substance or waste disposal site.

“Owner” means any person who owns an inactive hazardous substance or waste disposal site, or any part thereof.

“Release” means release as defined in the CERCLA/SARA.

“Remedy” or “Remedial Action” means remedy or remedial action as defined in CERCLA/SARA.

“Remove” or “Removal” means remove or removal as defined in CERCLA/SARA.

“Responsible party” means any person who is liable pursuant to

G.S. 130A-310.7

.

History.
1987, c. 574, s. 2; 1989, c. 286, s. 2; 1999-83, s. 1.

§ 130A-310.1.
Identification, inventory, and monitoring of inactive hazardous substance or waste disposal sites; duty of owners, operators, and responsible parties to provide information and access; remedies.

The Department shall develop and implement a program for locating, cataloguing, and monitoring all inactive hazardous substance or waste disposal sites in North Carolina. The Secretary shall compile and maintain an inventory of all inactive hazardous
substance or waste disposal sites based on information submitted by owners, operators, and responsible parties, and on data obtained directly by the Secretary. The Secretary shall maintain records of any evidence of contamination
to the air, surface water, groundwater, surface or subsurface soils, or waste streams for inventoried sites. The records shall include all available information on the extent of any actual damage or potential danger to public health
or to the environment resulting from the contamination.

The Commission shall develop and make available a format and checklist for submission of data relevant to inactive hazardous substance or waste disposal sites. Within 90 days of the date on which an owner, operator, or responsible party knows or should
know of the existence of an inactive hazardous substance or waste disposal site, the owner, operator, or responsible party shall submit to the Secretary all site data that is known or readily available to the owner, operator, or
responsible party. The owner, operator, or responsible party shall certify under oath that, to the best of his knowledge and belief, the data is complete and accurate.

Whenever the Secretary determines that there is a release, or substantial threat of a release, into the environment of a hazardous substance from an inactive hazardous substance or waste disposal site, the Secretary may, in addition to any other powers
he may have, order any responsible party to conduct any monitoring, testing, analysis, and reporting that the Secretary deems reasonable and necessary to ascertain the nature and extent of any hazard posed by the site. Written
notice of any order issued pursuant to this section shall be given to all persons subject to the order as set out in G.S. 130A-310.3(c). The Secretary, prior to the entry of any order, shall solicit the cooperation of the responsible
party.

If a person fails to submit data as required in subsection (b) of this section or violates the requirements or schedules in an order issued pursuant to subsection (c) of this section, the Secretary may institute an action for injunctive relief, irrespective
of all other remedies at law, in the superior court of the county where the violation occurred or where a defendant resides.

Whenever a person ordered to take any action pursuant to this section is unable or fails to do so, or if the Secretary, after making a reasonable attempt, is unable to locate any responsible party, the Secretary may take the action. The cost of any action
by the Secretary pursuant to this section may be paid from the Inactive Hazardous Sites Cleanup Fund, subject to a later action for reimbursement pursuant to

G.S. 130A-310.7

. The provisions of subdivisions (a)(1) to (a)(3) of G.S.130A-310.6 shall apply to any action taken by the Secretary pursuant to this section.

Upon reasonable notice, the Secretary may require any person to furnish to the Secretary any information, document, or record in that person’s possession or under that person’s control that relates to:

The identification, nature, and quantity of material that has been or is generated, treated, stored, or disposed of at an inactive hazardous substance or waste disposal site or that is transported to an inactive hazardous substance or waste disposal site.

The nature and extent of a release or threatened release of a hazardous substance or hazardous waste at or from an inactive hazardous substance or waste disposal site.

Information relating to the ability of a person to pay for or to perform a cleanup.

A person who is required to furnish any information, document, or record under subsection (f) of this section shall either allow the Secretary to inspect and copy all information, documents, and records or shall copy and furnish to the Secretary all information,
documents, and records at the expense of the person.

To collect information to administer this Part, the Secretary may subpoena the attendance and testimony of witnesses and the production of documents, records, reports, answers to questions, and any other information that the Secretary deems necessary.
Witnesses shall be paid the same fees and mileage that are paid to witnesses in proceedings in the General Court of Justice. In the event that a person fails to comply with a subpoena issued under this subsection, the Secretary
may seek enforcement of the subpoena in the superior court in any county where the inactive hazardous substance or waste disposal site is located, in the county where the person resides, or in the county where the person has his
or her principal place of business.

A person who owns or has control over an inactive hazardous substance or waste disposal site shall grant the Secretary access to the site at reasonable times. If a person fails to grant the Secretary access to the site, the Secretary may obtain an administrative
search and inspection warrant as provided by

G.S. 15-27.2

.

History.
1987, c. 574, s. 2; 1989, c. 286, s. 3; 1997-53, s. 1.

Legal Periodicals.

For 1997 legislative survey, see 20 Campbell L. Rev. 443 (1998).

§ 130A-310.2.
Inactive Hazardous Waste Sites Priority List.

No later than six months after July 1, 1987, the Commission shall develop a system for the prioritization of inactive hazardous substance or waste disposal sites based on the extent to which such sites endanger the public health and the environment. The
Secretary shall apply the prioritization system to the inventory of sites to create and maintain an Inactive Hazardous Waste Site Priority List, which shall rank all inactive hazardous substance or waste disposal sites in decreasing
order of danger. This list shall identify the location of each site and the type and amount of hazardous substances or waste known or believed to be located on the site. The first such list shall be published within two years after
July 1, 1987, with subsequent lists to be published at intervals of not more than two years thereafter. The Secretary shall notify owners, operators, and responsible parties of sites listed on the Inactive Hazardous Waste Sites
Priority List of their ranking on the list. The Inactive Hazardous Sites Priority List shall be used by the Department in determining budget requests and in allocating any State appropriation which may be made for remedial action,
but shall not be used so as to impede any other action by the Department, or any remedial or other action for which funds are available.

Repealed by Session Laws 2012-200, s. 21(e), effective August 1, 2012.

History.
1987, c. 574, s. 2; 2008-107, s. 12.1A(a); 2012-200, s. 21(e).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2008-107, s. 12.1A(a), effective July 1, 2008, designated the previous existing provisions as subsection (a); and added subsection (b).

Session Laws 2012-200, s. 21(e), effective August 1, 2012, repealed subsection (b) which read: “No later than January 1 of each year, the Department shall report to each member of the General Assembly who has an inactive hazardous substance or waste disposal
site in the member’s district. This report shall include the location of each inactive hazardous substance or waste disposal site in the member’s district, the type and amount of hazardous substances or waste known or believed to be
located on each of these sites, the last action taken at each of these sites, and the date of that last action.”

§ 130A-310.3.
Remedial action programs for inactive hazardous substance or waste disposal sites.

The Secretary may issue a written declaration, based upon findings of fact, that an inactive hazardous substance or waste disposal site endangers the public health or the environment. After issuing such a declaration, and at any time during which the
declaration is in effect, the Secretary shall be responsible for:

Monitoring the inactive hazardous substance or waste disposal site;

Developing a plan for public notice and for community and local government participation in any inactive hazardous substance or waste disposal site remedial action program to be undertaken;

Approving an inactive hazardous substance or waste disposal site remedial action program for the site;

Coordinating the inactive hazardous substance or waste disposal site remedial action program for the site; and

Ensuring that the hazardous substance or waste disposal site remedial action program is completed.

Where possible, the Secretary shall work cooperatively with any owner, operator, responsible party, or any appropriate agency of the State or federal government to develop and implement the inactive hazardous substance or waste disposal site remedial
action program. The Secretary shall not take action under this section to the extent that the Commission, the Commissioner of Agriculture, or the Pesticide Board has assumed jurisdiction pursuant to Articles 21 or 21A of Chapter
143 of the General Statutes.

Whenever the Secretary has issued such a declaration, and at any time during which the declaration is in effect, the Secretary may, in addition to any other powers he may have, order any responsible party:

To develop an inactive hazardous substance or waste disposal site remedial action program for the site subject to approval by the Department, and

To implement the program within reasonable time limits specified in the order.

Written notice of such an order shall be provided to all persons subject to the order personally or by certified mail. If given by certified mail, notice shall be deemed to have been given on the date appearing in the return of the receipt. If giving
of notice cannot be accomplished either personally or by certified mail, notice shall be given as provided in

G.S. 1A-1

, Rule 4(j).

In any inactive hazardous substance or waste disposal site remedial action program implemented hereunder, the Secretary shall ascertain the most nearly applicable cleanup standard as would be applied under CERCLA/SARA, and may seek federal approval of
any such program to insure concurrent compliance with federal standards. State standards may exceed and be more comprehensive than such federal standards. The Secretary shall assure concurrent compliance with applicable standards
set by the Commission.

For any removal or remedial action conducted entirely on-site under this Part, to the extent that a permit would not be required under 42 U.S.C. § 9621(e) for a removal or remedial action conducted entirely on-site under CERCLA/SARA, the Secretary may
grant a waiver from any State law or rule that requires that an environmental permit be obtained from the Department. The Secretary shall not waive any requirement that a permit be obtained unless either the removal or remedial
action is being conducted pursuant to G.S. 130A-310.3(c), 130A-310.5, or 130A-310.6, or the owner, operator, or other responsible party has entered into an agreement with the Secretary to implement a voluntary remedial action plan
under G.S. 130A-310.9(b). The Secretary shall invite public participation in the development of the remedial action plan in the manner set out in

G.S. 130A-310.4

prior to granting a permit waiver, except for a removal or remedial action conducted pursuant to

G.S. 130A-310.5

.

In order to reduce or eliminate the danger to public health or the environment posed by an inactive hazardous substance or waste disposal site, an owner, operator, or other responsible party may impose restrictions on the current or future use of the
real property comprising any part of the site if the restrictions meet the requirements of this subsection. The restrictions must be agreed to by the owner of the real property, included in a remedial action plan for the site that
has been approved by the Secretary, and implemented as a part of the remedial action program for the site. The Secretary may approve restrictions included in a remedial action plan in accordance with standards determined as provided
in subsection (d) of this section or pursuant to rules adopted under Chapter 150B of the General Statutes. Restrictions may apply to activities on, over, or under the land, including, but not limited to, use of groundwater, building,
filling, grading, excavating, and mining. Any approved restriction shall be enforced by any owner, operator, or other party responsible for the inactive hazardous substance or waste disposal site. Any land-use restriction may also
be enforced by the Department through the remedies provided in Part 2 of Article 1 of this Chapter or by means of a civil action. The Department may enforce any land-use restriction without first having exhausted any available
administrative remedies. A land-use restriction may also be enforced by any unit of local government having jurisdiction over any part of the site. A land-use restriction shall not be declared unenforceable due to lack of privity
of estate or contract, due to lack of benefit to particular land, or due to lack of any property interest in particular land. Any person who owns or leases a property subject to a land-use restriction under this Part shall abide
by the land-use restriction.

History.
1987, c. 574, s. 2; 1989, c. 727, s. 145; 1991, c. 281, ss. 1, 2; 1997-394, s. 1; 2002-154, s. 2; 2014-122, s. 11(f).